Connecticut, session 2026, SB00033.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 32-4i of the general statutes be amended to require the
Commissioner of Economic and Community Development to establish
the Learn Here, Live Here program, increase the annual expenditure on
such program to not more than five million dollars and make such
program available only to individuals whose annual federal adjusted
gross income is seventy-five thousand dollars or less.